Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.08.088

Authorized but unissued shares of capital stock—When shares become part of capital stock.

The authorized but unissued shares shall not become a part of the capital stock until they have been issued and paid for.

[ 1994 c 256 s 46; 1994 c 92 s 53; 1986 c 279 s 27; 1979 c 106 s 2; 1965 c 140 s 2. Formerly RCW 30.08.088.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1994 c 92 s 53 and by 1994 c 256 s 46, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section pursuant to RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.